North Carolina, session 2025, HB331.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State rice festival.
The North Carolina Rice Festival held the first weekend in March of every year at the
Brunswick Town State Historic Site in the community of Winnabow is adopted as the official
rice festival of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H331-v-2*